Nebraska, session 109, LB367.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB367 LB367
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 38-101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-101 Sections 38-101 to 38-1,148 and section 3 of this act and the
following practice acts shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform
Credentialing Act:
(1) The Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Practice Act;
(2) The Alcohol and Drug Counseling Practice Act;
(3) The Athletic Training Practice Act;
(4) The Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act;
(5) The Behavior Analyst Practice Act;
(6) The Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act;
(7) The Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist Practice Act;
(8) The Chiropractic Practice Act;
(9) The Clinical Nurse Specialist Practice Act;
(10) The Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and
Body Art Practice Act;
(11) The Dentistry Practice Act;
(12) The Dialysis Patient Care Technician Registration Act;
(13) The Emergency Medical Services Practice Act;
(14) The Environmental Health Specialists Practice Act;
(15) The Funeral Directing and Embalming Practice Act;
(16) The Genetic Counseling Practice Act;
(17) The Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act;
(18) The Licensed Practical Nurse-Certified Practice Act until
November 1, 2017;
(19) The Massage Therapy Practice Act;
(20) The Medical Nutrition Therapy Practice Act;
(21) The Medical Radiography Practice Act;
(22) The Medicine and Surgery Practice Act;
(23) The Mental Health Practice Act;
(24) The Nurse Practice Act;
-2-

LB367 LB367
2025 2025
(25) The Nurse Practitioner Practice Act;
(26) The Nursing Home Administrator Practice Act;
(27) The Occupational Therapy Practice Act;
(28) The Optometry Practice Act;
(29) The Perfusion Practice Act;
(30) The Pharmacy Practice Act;
(31) The Physical Therapy Practice Act;
(32) The Podiatry Practice Act;
(33) The Psychology Practice Act;
(34) The Respiratory Care Practice Act;
(35) The Surgical First Assistant Practice Act; and
(36) The Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act.
If there is any conflict between any provision of sections 38-101 to
38-1,148 and section 3 of this act and any provision of a practice act,
the provision of the practice act shall prevail except as otherwise
specifically provided in section 38-129.02.
Sec. 2. Section 38-178, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-178 Except as otherwise provided in sections 38-1,119 to
38-1,123, a credential to practice a profession may be issued subject to
discipline, denied, refused renewal, or have other disciplinary measures
taken against it in accordance with section 38-183, 38-185, or 38-186 on
any of the following grounds:
(1) Misrepresentation of material facts in procuring or attempting
to procure a credential;
(2) Immoral or dishonorable conduct evidencing unfitness to practice
the profession in this state;
(3) Abuse of, dependence on, or active addiction to alcohol, any
controlled substance, or any mind-altering substance;
(4) Failure to comply with a treatment program or an aftercare
program, including, but not limited to, a program entered into under the
-3-

LB367 LB367
2025 2025
Licensee Assistance Program established pursuant to section 38-175;
(5) Conviction of (a) a misdemeanor or felony under Nebraska law or
federal law, or (b) a crime in any jurisdiction which, if committed
within this state, would have constituted a misdemeanor or felony under
Nebraska law and which has a rational connection with the fitness or
capacity of the applicant or credential holder to practice the
profession;
(6) Practice of the profession (a) fraudulently, (b) beyond its
authorized scope, (c) with gross incompetence or gross negligence, or (d)
in a pattern of incompetent or negligent conduct;
(7) Practice of the profession while the ability to practice is
impaired by alcohol, controlled substances, drugs, mind-altering
substances, physical disability, mental disability, or emotional
disability;
(8) Physical or mental incapacity to practice the profession as
evidenced by a legal judgment or a determination by other lawful means;
(9) Illness, deterioration, or disability that impairs the ability
to practice the profession;
(10) Permitting, aiding, or abetting the practice of a profession or
the performance of activities requiring a credential by a person not
credentialed to do so;
(11) Performing or offering to perform scleral tattooing as defined
in section 38-10,172 by a person not credentialed to do so;
(12) Having had his or her credential denied, refused renewal,
limited, suspended, revoked, or disciplined in any manner similar to
section 38-196 by another state or jurisdiction based upon acts by the
applicant or credential holder similar to acts described in this section;
(13) Use of untruthful, deceptive, or misleading statements in
advertisements, including failure to comply with section 38-124;
(14) Conviction of fraudulent or misleading advertising or
conviction of a violation of the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act;
-4-

LB367 LB367
2025 2025
(15) Distribution of intoxicating liquors, controlled substances, or
drugs for any other than lawful purposes;
(16) Violations of the Uniform Credentialing Act or the rules and
regulations relating to the particular profession;
(17) Unlawful invasion of the field of practice of any profession
regulated by the Uniform Credentialing Act which the credential holder is
not credentialed to practice;
(18) Violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act or any rules
and regulations adopted pursuant to the act;
(19) Failure to file a report required by section 38-1,124,
38-1,125, or 71-552;
(20) Failure to maintain the requirements necessary to obtain a
credential;
(21) Violation of an order issued by the department;
(22) Violation of an assurance of compliance entered into under
section 38-1,108;
(23) Failure to pay an administrative penalty;
(24) Unprofessional conduct as defined in section 38-179;
(25) Violation of the Automated Medication Systems Act;
(26) Failure to comply with section 38-1,147; or
(27) Violation of the Preborn Child Protection Act; or .
(28) Providing conversion therapy, gender identity conversion
therapy, or sexual orientation conversion therapy in violation of section
3 of this act.
Sec. 3. (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a
person holding a credential under the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act,
the Mental Health Practice Act, the Nurse Practice Act, the Pharmacy
Practice Act, or the Psychology Practice Act shall not provide conversion
therapy, gender identity conversion therapy, or sexual orientation
conversion therapy to any individual under nineteen years of age.
(2) For purposes of this section:
-5-

LB367 LB367
2025 2025
(a)(i) Conversion therapy means a practice that seeks to change an
individual's sexual orientation or gender identity; and
(ii) Conversion therapy does not mean a practice that does not seek
to change an individual's sexual orientation or gender identity and that:
(A) Is neutral with respect to sexual orientation and gender
identity;
(B) Provides assistance to a patient or client undergoing gender
transition;
(C) Provides acceptance, support, and understanding to a patient or
client;
(D) Facilitates a patient's or client's ability to cope, develop
social support, and explore or understand the patient or client; or
(E) Addresses unlawful or unsafe sexual activities in a manner that
is neutral with respect to sexual orientation and gender identity;
(b) Gender identity conversion therapy means any psychotherapy,
counseling, or treatment, the goal of which is to alter the gender-
related identity of an individual so that such individual's gender
identity, appearance, expression, or behavior is eliminated, reduced, or
redirected to the individual's assigned sex at birth; and
(c) Sexual orientation conversion therapy means any psychotherapy,
counseling, or treatment, the goal of which is to alter the sexual or
romantic attraction, desire, or behavior of an individual toward other
individuals of the same sex so that the attraction and behavior of such
individual is eliminated, reduced, or redirected toward individuals of
the opposite sex.
(3) A violation of subsection (1) of this section shall constitute a
deceptive trade practice under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act
and shall be subject to any remedies or penalties available for a
violation of such act.
(4) This section does not apply to a practice or treatment conducted
by a clergy member or religious counselor who is acting in a pastoral or
-6-

LB367 LB367
2025 2025
religious capacity and not in the capacity of a health care professional.
(5) No state funds or funds belonging to a political subdivision of
this state shall be expended for the purpose of:
(a) Conducting conversion therapy, gender identity conversion
therapy, or sexual orientation conversion therapy;
(b) Referring an individual for conversion therapy, gender identity
conversion therapy, or sexual orientation conversion therapy; or
(c) Providing health benefits coverage for conversion therapy,
gender identity conversion therapy, or sexual orientation conversion
therapy.
Sec. 4. Section 38-2894, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-2894 (1) A registration to practice as a pharmacy technician may
be denied, refused renewal, removed, or suspended or have other
disciplinary measures taken against it by the department, with the
recommendation of the board, for failure to meet the requirements of or
for violation of any of the provisions of subdivisions (1) through (18)
and (20) through (28) (27) of section 38-178 and sections 38-2890 to
38-2897 or the rules and regulations adopted under such sections.
(2) If the department proposes to deny, refuse renewal of, or remove
or suspend a registration, it shall send the applicant or registrant a
notice setting forth the action to be taken and the reasons for the
determination. The denial, refusal to renew, removal, or suspension shall
become final thirty days after mailing the notice unless the applicant or
registrant gives written notice to the department of his or her desire
for an informal conference or for a formal hearing.
(3) Notice may be served by any method specified in section
25-505.01, or the department may permit substitute or constructive
service as provided in section 25-517.02 when service cannot be made with
reasonable diligence by any of the methods specified in section
25-505.01.
-7-

LB367 LB367
2025 2025
(4) Pharmacy technicians may participate in the Licensee Assistance
Program described in section 38-175.
Sec. 5. Original sections 38-101, 38-178, and 38-2894, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-